Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [197.581] COMMANDERS TASK FORCE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Commanders Task Force is established to advise the legislature, the governor, and the commissioner on matters pertaining to veterans and veterans' families. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin The task force must consist of the elected leaders from the following congressionally chartered veteran service organizations in Minnesota: new text end new text begin (1) The American Legion; new text end new text begin (2) American Veterans; new text end new text begin (3) Disabled American Veterans; new text end new text begin (4) Jewish War Veterans; new text end new text begin (5) Marine Corps League; new text end new text begin (6) Military Order of the Purple Heart; new text end new text begin (7) Paralyzed Veterans of America; and new text end new text begin (8) Veterans of Foreign Wars. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Organization. new text end new text begin (a) The task force shall adopt standing rules and order of business for conducting regular meetings. new text end new text begin (b) The task force shall annually elect a chair and a vice-chair from among current task force members. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The task force shall: new text end new text begin (1) advise the commissioner, the legislature, and the governor on matters relating to veterans, the families of veterans, and the Minnesota Department of Veterans Affairs; and new text end new text begin (2) serve as a liaison between state government and the organizations that make up the task force membership. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Compensation. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 15.059, subdivision 6, members are not entitled to compensation, per diem, reimbursement for child care expenses, or other expense reimbursement from state funds. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 15.059, subdivision 6, the task force shall not expire. new text end